Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Public Defense Services Commission, for  the
biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the
following purposes:
(1) Executive Division ....................  $ 3,600,361
(2) Compliance, Audit and
Performance Division................ $ 4,656,251
(3) Appellate Division ..................... $ 24,925,503
(4) Trial Criminal Division ............. $186,458,931
(5) Nonroutine Expenses ................ $ 43,663,533
(6) Court Mandated Expenses ........ $ 15,006,403
(7) Juvenile Division....................... $ 30,577,095
(8) Administrative Services
Division..................................... $ 12,486,505
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Public Defense Services
Commission, for the following purposes:
(1) Court Mandated Expenses ........ $ 4,449,667
(2) Juvenile Division....................... $ 14,000,000
SECTION 3. (1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2021, out of the General
Fund, the following amounts, to  be allocated to the Public Defense Services Commission for
the following purposes:
(a) Trial Criminal Division ............. $ 70,250,989
(b) Nonroutine Expenses ................ $ 14,554,511
(c) Court Mandated Expenses ........ $ 5,002,135
(d) Juvenile Division....................... $ 10,192,365
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 1
(2) If any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not  allocated
by the Emergency Board prior to December 1, 2022, the moneys remaining on  that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (2), chapter 303, Oregon Laws
2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for professional services, is increased by
$3,782,000 for nonroutine expenses and court-mandated expenses.
SECTION 5.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Passed by House June 15, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 22, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 2